runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
автомагістраль/E.
агрокалендар/5$)
акумуляторник/2:%
алгебраїстка/&=k
алюмомідь/E.
антипатичний/m,
астигмометр/2:%
астробіологиня/&<k
Атамань/E!
бабище/TuU'i
багатель/E.
багатоплідний/m,
байдаркар/5$)
барліг/0x+z
батир/5$)
Батіг/0x+
батіг/0x+z
безвладний/m,
безкорисливий/m,
безутратний/m,
белькіт/0
бенкетар/5$)
берлінка/&=k
Бишкінь/0xE!
бік/0+z
більдредактор/2:%{
бінормаль/E.
божище/X1T
боївкар/5$)K
Бондар/5$
бородище/TU'i
борсучище/X1
брахісинкліналь/E.
брежнєвщина/&
брести/_|*
Бринь/E!
Бродів/0x7
вазоконстриктор/2:%
вебкам-модель/E.
веломотогонка/&=
веприще/X1
вертлявий/m,
верф/E.
вести/_|*>
вестися/_|*
ветсанлікар/5$)
вигукувати/Z|w(
визгін/0
виліт/5)
вималювати/Z(O
вислати/Z(^
Високинь/E!
вишукати/[(
відеосторож/2:%{
відміль/E.
відпрацьовувати/Z|w(
відріг/0x+z
відьмище/TuU'i
вікіголічка/&=k
вітрище/X1
вітруганище/X1
владар/5$)
вмазати/Z(
водовідбір/0
Волинь/E!
ворожий/m,
гадючище/TU'i
газель/E.!
Гандеровиця/&k
гаситель/2:%
глиняр/5$)K
глиця/&<
гниловід/0z
гнутар/5$)
Годинь/E!
головище/TU'i
гонорар/2%
Горинів/I"
гортань/E.
градище/X1
гробар/5$)
гусляр/5$)K
даїшниця/&<k
Даніель/2:E!
двократний/m,
держзахід/0z
дзиґарик/2:%
дикунка/&=k
дівчище/TU'
Дігтяр/5$K
доглядати/[|Q(
Домоткань/E!
доукомплектовувати/Z|w(
драматичний/m,
дронар/5$)
дружище/X1
Друхів/0x7
душпастир/5$)
еквівокація/&
екскурс/2%
електропанель/E.
Еммануель/2:%E!
епідпоріг/0+z
етнокалендар/5$)
ехокамера/&<
євросезон/2%
жабище/TU'i
Жердь/E!
жнець/5$)K
забір/0z
зав'язь/E.
загальнопоширений/m,
заказувати/Z|w(
замчище/X1T
заокруглювати/Z|w(
Заприп'ять/E!
Заріг/0x+7
заскочка/&=
засукати/Z([
звогчувати/Z|w(
здивований/m,
землеустрій/0z
знахар/5$)
зрівноважувач/2:%
зціплювати/Z|w(
іграшкар/5$)K
імінокислота/&<
іржати/_|*
Ісабель/E!
кавунище/X1
Канберра/&k
канонічний/m,
капель/E.
караїб/2:%{
Катинь/E!
квиткар/5$)
кесар/5$)
кіберпростір/0z
кіноваріація/&<
кінооповідь/E.
кінорік/0+
класти/_|*>
кластися/_|*
Клевень/E!
клістрон/2:%
ковзаняр/5$)K
козир/5$)
комунікативістика/&
кормосуміш/E.
коропище/X1
Косонь/E!
Костянтинів/m0x7
котляр/5$)K
красти/_|*>
крастися/_|*
кресляр/5$)K
крільчатник/2:%
Крісталіна/&k
кровотік/0+z
кулачище/X1
куций/m,
Липів/0x7
Липовець/5$4b
лихвар/5$)
лісище/X1
лобище/X1
Лодзь/E!
луфар/5$)K
Луцій/2:%
людино-рік/0+
Людинь/E!
лялькар/5$)
мазохістка/&=k
маслопровід/0z
масть/E.
Межисить/E!
мийник/2:%
мимовільний/m,
мікророль/E.
модернізаторка/&=k
молотобоєць/5$)
мордобій/0z
мореходець/5$)
моріг/0+z
морозище/X1
мужичище/X1
муштабель/2:%
наволоч/E.!
нажбурляти/[(
напружений/m,
насаджувати/Z|w(
невтомлений/m,
недовідбір/0
неконтрольований/m,
неприкритий/m,
неуявний/m,
нехристь/E.!
нечисть/E.
низати/Z|w(
Новоскелюватка/&k
Норець/5$
норман/2:%{
носище/X1
нудьгар/5$)
Оболонь/E!
оборіг/0+z
обпаскуджувати/Z|w(
одписати/Z(
Ожгів/0x7
опуклий/m,
Орша/&k
остріг/0+z
павучище/X1
пагонець/5$)
пам'ять/E.
пантопон/2%
парубище/X1
пастир/5$)
Паськів/0x7
пенетрометрія/&
перев'язати/Z(
переліг/0z+
перемелювати/Z|w(
Періг/0x+
Пиріг/0x+
пиріг/0x+z
писанкар/5$)
пищаль/E.
підбір/0
підлесний/m,
підмішати/[(
підпомічник/2:%
Пістинь/2:E!
плотар/5$)
поводир/5$)
повпихати/[(
подорож/E.
позір/0
позсипати/[(
пообліплювати/Z(
поперемінний/m,
поприорювати/Z(
поріг/0x+z
поселянка/&=k
постать/E.!
постдок/2:%
поушкоджувати/Z(
прихвостень/5$)
продовжувати/Z|w(
промартіль/E.
променистий/m,
проріст/0z
прясти/_|*>
прястися/_|*
псар/5$)
психастенік/2:%
псище/X1T
Пустош/E!
радіокоментар/5$)
реконкіста/&
ринолог/2:%
ріг/0z+x
рік/0+z7
Ровець/5$
розбрід/0z
розважливий/m,
розметати/Z[(
розповідь/E.
Рубань/E!
свекрушище/T'i
свободовець/5$)
святвечір/0xz
секундомір/2:%
семиповерхівка/&=
сільгоспрік/0+
склопанель/E.
скорботний/m,
Снісар/5$
снопище/X1
собачище/X1T
Созань/E!
сомище/X1
сопілкар/5$)
Сопіт/2:0x7
спектрофотометр/2:%
стеатопігія/&
стіг/0+z
стожище/X1T
страшненький/m,
стрічкар/5$)
стьобати/[|Q(
субпанель/E.
суперважковик/2:%
супердвобій/0z
сурмар/5$)K
сутяжище/X1'i
сучище/TU'i
телеподорож/E.
Терапонт/2:%{
тинькар/5$)
титанка/&=k
тік/0z+
Тмутаракань/E!
томливий/m,
топіт/0
трель/E.
трембітар/5$)K
турище/X1
тюк/2:%
упир/5$)
фіксований/m,
фолк-музика/&
форель/E.
фотовитвір/0z
фотокалендар/5$)
фотомодель/E.!
Хоровець/5$4b
хортище/X1
ціан/2%
чепець/5$)
червобій/0
чоловічище/X1
шаль/E.
Шамраївка/&k
Шандровець/5$
шишкар/5$)
Шлапань/E!
штатний/m,
Юліямпіль/0x
язичище/X1
